District of Columbia statutes.
29-414.04

Quorum requirement for existing nonprofit corporations.

With respect to a nonprofit corporation that was in existence on the effective date of this chapter, except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, one-tenth of the votes of members entitled to vote in person or by proxy shall constitute a quorum.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(d)(23), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.